Nevada, session 83, AB593.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Interim Finance Committee the sum of $53,434,995 for
allocation to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor for
costs associated with the implementation of the Enterprise Resource
Planning System.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Interim Finance Committee the sum of $12,534,135 for
allocation to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor for
costs associated with the implementation of the Enterprise Resource
Planning System.
Sec. 3. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
section 1 or 2 of this act must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or
any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the fund from which
it was appropriated on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)